Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.193

Fred Hutch license plates.

"Fred Hutch license plates" means special license plates issued under RCW 46.18.200 that display the logo of the Fred Hutchinson cancer research center.

[ 2017 c 25 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 c 25: See note following RCW 46.18.200.